Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Chapter 55. Shooting and Firearm Safety.

Sec. 16.55.010.
Duties of department.

The Department of Fish and Game shall

assist in developing and coordinating activities involving private organizations relating to shooting and firearms;

develop a hunting safety program for the people of the state;

establish a program to assist in the planning, construction, and operation of public shooting ranges.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1980)

Sec. 16.55.020.
Powers of department.

In the discharge of its duties under AS

16.55.010

, the Department of Fish and Game may

provide, through a departmental coordinator, technical assistance to municipalities, communities, and organizations;

make grants to municipalities and organizations as provided in AS

16.55.030

to develop and operate public shooting ranges and facilities; and

to operate programs involving education and training in the safe use of firearms.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1980)

Sec. 16.55.030.
Grants.

Subject to legislative appropriation for the purpose, the Department of Fish and Game may make grants to municipalities and private organizations in accordance with AS

16.55.020

(2). The department may impose reasonable restrictions on the use of funds granted under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1980)

Sec. 16.55.040.
Advisory committee.

There is established in the Department of Fish and Game an Advisory Committee on Hunting and Firearm Safety. The committee consists of five members appointed by the commissioner of fish and game and serving at the commissioner’s pleasure. Members of the advisory committee serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses provided by law for members of boards and commissions.

The Advisory Committee on Hunting and Firearm Safety shall select one of its members as chairman.

The Advisory Committee on Hunting and Firearm Safety shall meet at the call of the chairman or at the request of a majority of its members.

The Advisory Committee on Hunting and Firearm Safety shall advise the Department of Fish and Game in fulfilling its responsibilities under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 28 SLA 1980)